Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201658-270
Authority; reports; contents; audit;
issuance of bonds; notices.

(1) The authority shall, following
the close of each fiscal year, submit a report of its activities for the preceding
year to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature. The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall
be submitted electronically. Each member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such report by making
a request for it to the chairperson of the authority. Each report shall set
forth a complete operating and financial statement for the authority during
the fiscal year it covers. An independent certified public accountant shall
at least once in each year audit the books and accounts of the authority.

(2) At least fourteen days prior to taking any final action to authorize
the issuance of bonds to provide financing for projects, the beneficiaries
or borrowers of which are not specifically identified, the authority shall
notify the Governor, the Clerk of the Legislature, and any news media requesting
notification of such proposed issuance of bonds. The notification submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically. Such notice shall include:

(a) The public purposes to be effectuated and the needs to be addressed
through the issuance of the bonds;

(b) The manner in which such need was identified;

(c) The anticipated principal amount of the bond issue and the anticipated
date of issuance of the bonds;

(d) The anticipated size of any reserve funds; and

(e) The professionals involved in connection with the issuance of the
bonds.

(3) Within thirty days following the issuance of bonds subject to subsection
(2) of this section, the authority shall notify the Governor and the Clerk
of the Legislature of:

(a) The final principal amount of the bonds;

(b) The net interest cost of the bonds;

(c) The costs of issuance paid and to whom paid;

(d) The total amount of any reserve funds;

(e) The net interest cost to the beneficiaries or borrowers; and

(f) The amount of funds available for loans.

The notification submitted
to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

(4) With respect to bonds subject to subsection (2) of this section,
until ninety-five percent of the proceeds of such bonds to be made available
for loans are so used or a corresponding amount of such bonds are redeemed,
the authority shall, no less often than quarterly after the issuance of such
bonds, report to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature the status
of the use of the proceeds of such issue of bonds. The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall
be submitted electronically.

Once the notice required pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
is filed, nothing in this section shall require the authority to amend or
supplement the notice prior to the issuance of the bonds.

(5) The notice and reporting requirements contained in this section
shall be deemed satisfied upon good faith compliance by the authority. The
failure to comply with any part of this section shall not affect the validity
of any bonds issued by the authority.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 70;

Laws 1984, LB 372, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 67;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 86.